Idaho statutes. Title 38 FORESTRY, FOREST PRODUCTS AND STUMPAGE DISTRICTS
Chapter 1 IDAHO FORESTRY ACT
§ 38-122. Protection by logging outfits — Fire suppression account — Liability for fire suppression costs — Penalty.

Everyone engaged, or about to engage, in the cutting of any forest product or potential forest product upon lands within the state of Idaho shall provide for the management and reduction of the fire hazard thus created or to be created by first securing a certificate of compliance from the director of the department of lands or his agent, said compliance to provide the option of entering into a fire hazard reduction agreement as provided in sections 38-401 through 38-410, Idaho Code, inclusive, or by posting a cash bond to the state of Idaho in such form and for such amount as may be prescribed by the director of the department of lands: provided, however, that the amount of the bond so prescribed shall not be in excess of the amount which such person would be required to pay under said sections 38-401 through 38-410, Idaho Code, inclusive, and that the bond shall be conditioned upon full and faithful compliance with all requirements under said sections 38-401 through 38-410, Idaho Code, inclusive, and the faithful reduction of such fire hazards in the manner prescribed by law. Provided further that the initial purchaser of ties, logs, posts, cordwood, pulpwood and other similar forest products which have been cut from lands within the state of Idaho shall make no such purchase from anyone not having a proper compliance under this section and formal acceptance of notification under subsection (2) of section 38-1306, Idaho Code. When a person elects to have hazard reduction money withheld in lieu of posting a cash bond, the purchaser of forest products shall withhold the money and said money so withheld in any one (1) calendar month shall be paid to the director of the department of lands or his agent on or before the last day of the next calendar month. After sending such moneys to the director of the department of lands the purchaser shall not be further liable to the state of Idaho or to the person from whom the money was withheld. The director of the department of lands, upon receipt of the cash bond or transmittal of withheld money, shall promptly deposit the same with the state treasurer to be held in trust until the hazard has been reduced as required by law. Such hazard reduction shall be accomplished by the responsible party within the terms set forth in the certificate of compliance or such additional time as may be granted by the director of the department of lands, and upon completion thereof, the director of the department of lands or his agent shall issue a certificate of clearance, stating that all the terms of this section have been complied with. Such clearance shall constitute reason for the release of said hazard reduction money and payment to the person entitled thereto or release of the cash bond posted, except that: (a) three percent (3%) of the hazard reduction money or bond shall be deposited in a special account to be known as the fire suppression account, which is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury, and which shall be used by the department of lands to help pay the cost of suppressing forest fires; and (b) as determined by the state board of land commissioners, for harvest from private land, an additional amount, not to exceed three percent (3%) of the hazard reduction money or bond shall be deposited in the forest practices administration account established in section 38-135, Idaho Code, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of the forest practices act, section 38-1301 et seq., Idaho Code. In the event the hazard reduction shall not be accomplished within said period of time, the money shall be released by the state treasurer on direction from the director of the department of lands less the three percent (3%) deduction specified for the fire suppression account and for harvest from private land, the deduction specified by the state board of land commissioners for the forest practices administration account, and credited to the “forest management account” for the management and reduction of any fire hazard and for the protection of forest resources as provided by section 38-408, Idaho Code.

With the exception of cases of negligence on the part of the landowner, operator or their agents, liability for the cost of suppressing fires that originate on or pass through a slashing area shall remain with the state forester [director of the department of lands] if one of the following alternatives is executed by the landowner or operator: (a) the slashing area is covered by a certificate of compliance and all hazard money payments are current or a proper bond is in place; (b) the landowner or operator treats the slash in accordance with rules adopted by the state board of land commissioners that are in effect during the period covered by the certificate of compliance or approved extensions; or (c) the landowner or operator elects to enter into a contract with the state forester [director of the department of lands] for the management of the slash and liability of fire suppression costs in accordance with section 38-404, Idaho Code.

A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a petty misdemeanor.

Should the landowner or operator choose not to treat the slash or not enter into a contract with the state forester [director of the department of lands] in accordance with section 38-404, Idaho Code, the landowner or operator shall, in addition to forfeiting the bond provided for in section 38-122, Idaho Code, be subject to the provisions of section 38-123, Idaho Code, and his liability, if any, for fire suppression costs up to the limits set by the state forester [director of the department of lands], shall exist for a period of five (5) years following completion of the operation for all fires that originate in or pass through the landowner’s or operator’s slashing area, except that the landowner or operator may choose to pay an additional fee, to be determined by the director, upon payment of which the director will assume the liability for the cost of suppressing fires that originate in or pass through the slashing area.

§ 38-123. Disposal of slash — Injunction against further cutting — Disposal at expense of owner — Lien and enforcement — Orders.

In the event one responsible therefor shall fail, refuse or neglect to properly dispose of slash in accordance with the requirements of section 38-122, Idaho Code, and such person responsible therefor is engaged or is about to engage, either for himself or for another, in cutting timber or other forest products, and thereby creating a fire hazard anywhere within the state, he may be enjoined from cutting such timber or other forest products and thereby creating a fire hazard until he shall have complied with the provisions of section 38-122, Idaho Code. Such injunction proceedings may be instituted by the director of the department of lands as plaintiff and the court may in its discretion grant a temporary injunction. In any such proceedings no bond shall be required of the plaintiff and such a proceeding shall be handled in any court by the judge thereof with expedition.

If one responsible therefor has for any reason failed to comply with section 38-122, Idaho Code, and has without such compliance cut timber or other forest products, and shall fail, refuse or neglect to properly dispose of slash for a period of thirty (30) days after being notified so to do by the director of the department of lands or the fire warden of the forest protective district within which such slash has accumulated, the director of the department of lands, or the fire warden, may, if he deems it advisable, complete, direct or authorize the disposal of such slash at the expense of the owner of the timber or other forest products cut or produced from the land upon which such fire hazard remains undisposed of as aforesaid.

The cost and expense of such disposal, plus twenty per cent (20%) of the cost and expense of such disposal as a penalty, shall constitute a prior lien upon the timber and/or other forest products so cut or produced from such land. If payment of such cost and penalty be not made within ten (10) days after demand in writing, the director of the department of lands shall file for record with the county recorder of the county in which such timber or other forest products were cut, or, if the same have been removed to another county, then in such county, a notice of lien upon any and all forest products cut from the area of slash undisposed of as aforesaid, and such lien shall also attach to all identifiable processed products thereof, and the perfection of such lien rights shall as nearly as practicable be in conformity with the provisions of section 45-407, Idaho Code, so far as the same is applicable, and duly verified as therein provided. Any claims of lien recorded as herein provided shall be released in writing by the director of the department of lands upon payment of the cost and penalty herein provided. After the filing of notice of lien, any purchaser or purchasers of any of such forest products who have disposed of the same or who shall have so mingled such forest products or the processed products thereof with other property as to prevent identification of such forest products, and thereby prevent the sale of any such products in such foreclosure proceedings, shall be liable for the full amount of the judgment recovered, provided such purchaser is made a party defendant in the suit for the foreclosure of lien. The proceedings for the enforcement of said lien shall conform as nearly as may be to the proceedings provided by law for the enforcement of loggers’ lien, or the amount of such cost and penalty may be recovered by a civil action for debt, prosecuted in the name of the state of Idaho, and payable to the state treasurer for deposit in the forest protection fund.
The director of the department of lands shall not file for record any lien against the property of any person who has been issued a certificate of clearance in accordance with section 38-122, Idaho Code, covering such property.

All orders and directions issued by the director of the department of lands, or any fire warden, as required or authorized by this section and section 38-122, Idaho Code, shall be in writing and made in triplicate, the original of which shall be sent by registered mail or delivered by personal service to the person to receive such order, permits or directions; one (1) copy shall be filed in the office of the director of the department of lands; and one (1) copy shall be filed in the district warden’s file.

§ 38-124. Precautions in disposal of slash — Separate offenses — Penalty.

Everyone making disposal of slash on forest land as provided for in this chapter shall use care to prevent fire from spreading to other forest land or the creation of further fire hazard by damage to timber growth left standing, and shall have sufficient men, tools, supplies and firefighting equipment on hand for that purpose, and when the burning has been completed, or when ordered by the fire warden, shall cause the fire to be totally extinguished without delay. Disposal of slash under the terms of this chapter shall be in accordance with the law requiring burning permits during the closed season.

Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter on any legal subdivision, shall constitute a separate and distinct offense and shall be deemed a misdemeanor.

§ 38-125. Clearing rights of way — Precaution in clearing — Application to public work — Penalty — Injunction.

Everyone clearing right of way for any railroad, public or private highway or road, public trail, public utility, logging road, trail, ditch, dike, pipe line or wire line, or any other transmission or transportation utility right of way, shall safely dispose of all refuse timber, brush, slash or debris cut for such clearing or resulting from the cutting of material for the construction of such right of way. Said piling and burning shall be done as rapidly as cutting and clearing progresses; provided, that upon application to the director of the department of lands, he may grant a permit extending the time within which such burning must be done; provided, further, that if such work be done during the closed season it must be done in compliance with all the provisions of this chapter relating to burning permits during the closed season.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all clearing of rights of way on behalf of the state, county, highway districts and road districts, whether the work be done by day labor, or by contract, and unless unavoidable emergency prevents, provisions shall be made by the proper officials conducting, directing, or letting said work, for withholding until it is complete, a sufficient portion of the payment therefor to insure compliance with this chapter.

Violation of any provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor.

In addition to the penalty herein provided, the offender may be enjoined at the instance of the director of the department of lands, or of the fire warden of the district, from proceeding with such work until the provisions of this section shall have been complied with; and, upon application of the director of the department of lands, or of the fire warden of the district, to any court of competent jurisdiction, a writ of mandate shall issue compelling the offender to fully comply with the provisions hereof.

§ 38-126. Interference with protective agencies — Penalty.

Any person who shall wilfully or maliciously do any act or thing tending to interfere with the efficient use and operation by any forest protective agency provided for by this chapter or operating under agreements with the director of the department of lands, of its tools, supplies and equipment, or with the performance of its duties, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 38-127. Destruction of signs and warnings — Penalties.

Any person who shall wilfully or maliciously destroy, deface, disfigure, or needlessly remove any sign, poster, warning or notice posted under the provisions of this chapter or by any forest protective agency cooperating with the state under this chapter, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

§ 38-128. Duties of prosecuting attorneys and attorney general.

At the discretion of the director of the department of lands, it shall be the duty of the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the county within which such action lies, to prepare, upon information furnished by the director of the department of lands or the fire warden of any forest protective district, and foreclose all liens, other than those provided for in sections 38-111, 38-112 and 38-113, Idaho Code, and to prosecute in the name of the state of Idaho all actions for the recovery of penalties and costs and expenses incurred by the director of the department of lands, his deputy or fire warden of the district in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, venue shall be determined subject to the terms of applicable Idaho law at the time of the incident. Civil actions against nonresidents of the state shall be prosecuted by the attorney general.

Whenever any arrest shall have been made for the violation of any provisions of this chapter, or whenever any evidence, which shows with reasonable certainty any such violation, shall have been lodged with him, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal act was committed must prosecute the offender with all diligence and energy.

§ 38-129. Forest protection fund — Custody, sources and appropriation — Disbursement.

The state treasurer shall be custodian of a fund known as the “forest protection fund” into which shall be paid all owners’ assessments, penalties and costs recovered in actions authorized by this chapter, and a portion of all fines as provided in the succeeding section and all funds accruing or received under any other provision of this chapter including all funds allocated by the United States under the act of March 1, 1911 (36 Stat. 96) and amendments thereto, known as the Weeks law, and the act of June 7, 1924, known as the Clarke-McNary act, and all other federal acts for forest fire protection. All moneys in existing forest protection or foresters’ special fund are hereby transferred to the forest protection fund established hereby.

All moneys appropriated for, accruing to or received by this fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes of this chapter and shall be paid out by the state treasurer only upon state vouchers prepared and approved by the director of the department of lands and approved by the state board of examiners. All disbursements, costs and expenses accruing, contracted for and/or incurred by the director of the department of lands in administering the provisions of this chapter and in carrying out the agreements authorized by section 38-104, Idaho Code, and not otherwise provided for shall be paid from this fund; provided, that disbursements of such portions of this fund as are represented by allotments to the state under the Weeks law and the Clarke-McNary act and other federal acts for forest fire protection shall be limited to the purpose for which such allotments are made by the federal government.

The director of the department of lands may convert the money derived from this fund into a revolving fund as may be necessary or into a general expense fund for the payment of such disbursements as are herein provided for.

§ 38-130. Disposition of fines.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19-4705, Idaho Code, fines collected for violations of this chapter or any provisions thereof shall be apportioned as follows: ten per cent (10%) to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, fifty per cent (50%) to the current expense fund of the county in which the violation occurred and forty per cent (40%) to the state treasurer for deposit in the forest protection fund.

§ 38-131. Deficiency warrants for excess costs of fire suppression.

In event the actual cost for the control or suppression of forest fires in any forest protective district exceeds in any one (1) year the maximum moneys available for forest protection in that district from the forest protection fund or any other special or general fund provided for that purpose, the state board of land commissioners may authorize the issuance of deficiency warrants for the purpose of defraying such excess costs and when so authorized the state controller shall draw deficiency warrants against the general fund.

§ 38-131A. Deficiency warrants for costs of fire suppression on state-owned range lands.

The state board of land commissioners may authorize the issuance of deficiency warrants for the purpose of paying the costs of fire suppression on state-owned range lands whether or not said lands are adjacent to or intermingled with forest lands. When so authorized, the state controller shall draw deficiency warrants against the general fund.

§ 38-132. Regulations of the board — Penalty for violation.

The state board of land commissioners may make such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, as may be reasonable and necessary or appropriate for carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for efficient administration thereof. Any person violating any rule or regulation of the board, after written notice of the regulation has been furnished, shall be deemed guilty of the same crime as provided in the section of this chapter to which the rule or regulation pertains or if none be specified, then such violation shall be deemed a petty misdemeanor.

§ 38-133. Officers charged with enforcement.

The director of the department of lands and his assistants, fire wardens, conservation officers and their deputies and all other peace officers of the state are hereby charged with the enforcement of the criminal provisions of this chapter and shall have full power and it shall be their duty to arrest with or without warrant any person found violating any of the provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations of the state board of land commissioners after notice made pursuant hereto and take him before a magistrate and make complaint, and when any such officer shall have information that such violation has been committed he shall make similar complaint.

The authority of the fire wardens respecting the control or suppression of forest fires, summoning help or making arrests for violation of this chapter or rules and regulations of the board may extend to any adjacent district or to any part of the state in times of great fire danger, providing that in case of conflict of authority resulting therefrom, the fire warden in whose district the fire is located shall have ultimate control. In emergencies fire wardens may commandeer tools, supplies and equipment and may employ able-bodied persons or compel assistance of able-bodied persons and neither the state board of land commissioners, the director, or his delegates, fire wardens or deputy fire wardens, shall be liable to civil action for trespass committed in the discharge of their duties; provided, that in performing their duties they exercise reasonable care to avoid doing unnecessary damage.

§ 38-134. Forest practices act administration — Funding.

The director of the department of lands is charged in section 38-1305, Idaho Code, to administer and enforce the forest practices act on all private forest lands within the state. Funding for this activity shall come from an annual budget request from the general fund and from an annual assessment to be paid by every private owner of forest land in the state. The assessment for private owners of forest lands whose total acres of forest lands are twenty-five (25) acres or fewer shall be equal to the per acre cost multiplied by twenty-five (25). For private owners of forest lands whose total acres of forest lands are twenty-six (26) acres or more, the assessment shall be determined by the state board of land commissioners not to exceed twenty cents (20¢) an acre per year. The assessment shall be collected in the same fashion and at the same time as the forest protection assessment described in section 38-111, Idaho Code.

§ 38-135. Forest practices administration account.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury a forest practices administration account into which shall be paid the assessment on private owners of forest lands as provided in section 38-134, Idaho Code.

§ 38-136. Community forestry trust account.

There is hereby created within the dedicated fund of the state treasury the community forestry trust account.

The account shall consist of the following:

Donations, gifts, and grants from any source;

Any other moneys which may hereinafter be provided by law; and

Interest earned by the account.

The director or designee of the department of lands may authorize disbursements of moneys from the account for projects related to community forestry.

Not less than thirty-five percent (35%) of the funding for an approved project shall be provided by the entity sponsoring or proposing the project or program. Contributions such as materials, personnel, supplies, or services may be considered as all or part of the funding provided by the petitioning entity.

§ 38-137, 38-138. State forest lands — Application of chapter — Separability. [Repealed.]